Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article II Standards and Schedules

21-28-2.01.
Authority to control — Registration requirements and procedures.

The director of health shall control all substances enumerated in §

21-28-2.08

or may by motion or on the petition of any interested party pursuant to the procedures of chapter 35 of title 42, the Administrative Procedures Act, add, reschedule, or delete a substance as a controlled substance. In making this determination, the director of health shall consider, but not be limited to the following:

( Its actual or relative potential for abuse;

Scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect if known;

State of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance;

Its history and current pattern of abuse;

The scope, duration, and significance of abuse;

What, if any, risk there is to the public health;

Its psychic or physiological dependence liability;

Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this chapter.

After considering the factors in subdivision (1) of this section the director of health shall make findings with respect to these factors and shall issue an order controlling the substance if it is found that the substance has potential for abuse.

If the director of health designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not be subject to control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.

If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law and notice of that action is given to the director of health, he or she shall similarly control the substance under this chapter after the expiration of sixty (60) days from publication in the federal register of a final order designating a substance as a controlled substance or rescheduling or deleting a substance, unless within that sixty (60) day period, the director of health objects to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion. In that case, the director of health shall publish the reasons for objection and afford all interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the conclusion of the hearing, the director of health shall publish his or her decision, which shall be final unless altered by statute. The director of health shall publish and file his or her decision with the secretary of state. Upon publication of objection to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion under this chapter by the director of health, control under this chapter is stayed until the director of health publishes his or her decision.

The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess controlled substances under this chapter:

An agent or employee of any registered manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser of any controlled substance if he or she is acting in the usual course of his or her business or employment;

A common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or an employee of a carrier or warehouse operator, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual course of business or employment;

An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful possession of a schedule V substance.

The director of health may waive by rule the requirement for registration of certain manufacturers, distributors, or dispensers if he or she finds it consistent with the public health and safety.

A separate registration is required at each place of business where the applicant manufactures, distributes, or dispenses controlled substances. A separate registration is required at each place of professional practice at which a practitioner stores controlled substances. A practitioner may prescribe and administer controlled substances, upon registering with the director of health at the applicant’s principal place of professional practice.

The director of health or his or her authorized agent may inspect the establishment of a registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with his or her regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 168, § 1.

21-28-2.02.
Schedules of controlled substances — Establishment.

There are established five (5) schedules of controlled substances, to be known as schedules I, II, III, IV, and V.

The schedules I, II, III, IV, and V shall, unless and until amended pursuant to this chapter, consist of: those enumerated in this article and include substances to be controlled by rule and/or regulation of the director of health as published, except all substances in schedules II, III, IV, and V will require a prescription to be dispensed by an apothecary in the state of Rhode Island; provided, that a prescription will not be required in the following cases: administering, dispensing, or selling at retail of any medicinal preparation that contains in one fluid ounce or if a solid or semi-solid preparation, in one avoirdupois ounce, not more than thirty and one-tenth (30.1) milligrams of opium. Notwithstanding the definition of the word opium contained in any other general or special law, the word opium for purposes of this section shall be as defined in the official United States pharmacopoeia. The prescription exemption authorized by this section shall be subject to the following conditions: (1) That the medicinal preparation administered, dispensed, or sold, shall contain, in addition to the narcotic drug in it, some drug or drugs conferring upon it medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone;

(2)

That the preparation shall be administered, dispensed, or sold in good faith as a medicine and not for the purpose of evading the provisions of this chapter, and provided the preparation shall be dispensed or sold only to a person who shall sign his or her name and address in a legible manner in a record book to be kept for that purpose by the seller.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.03.
Schedule I tests.

The director of health shall place a substance in schedule I if he or she finds that the substance:

Has high potential for abuse; and

Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.04.
Schedule II tests.

The director of health shall place a substance in schedule II if he or she finds that:

The substance has high potential for abuse;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and

The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.05.
Schedule III tests.

The director of health shall place a substance in schedule III if he or she finds that:

The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in schedules I and II;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.06.
Schedule IV tests.

The director of health shall place a substance in schedule IV if he or she finds that:

The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in schedule III;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substances may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to the controlled substances in schedule III.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.07.
Schedule V tests.

The director of health shall place a substance in schedule V if he or she finds that:

The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances in schedule IV;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence liability relative to the controlled substances listed in schedule IV.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.08.
Contents of schedules.

21-28-2.09.
Exemption of compounds containing counteragents.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any depressant or stimulant drug in schedule II or in subsection (a) of schedule III or in schedule IV or V if: (1) the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system, and (2) these ingredients are included in the compound, mixture or preparation in such combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration as to vitiate the potential for abuse of the drugs which do have a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-2.10.
Exemption of dextromethorphan.

Dextromethorphan shall not be deemed to be included in any schedule unless controlled pursuant to the provisions of this article.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.